Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1207.02
Emergency medical technician-intermediate practice of emergency medical care, defined.

Emergency medical technician-intermediate practice of emergency medical care means care provided in accordance with the knowledge and skill acquired through successful completion of an approved program for an emergency medical technician-intermediate. Such care includes, but is not limited to, (1) all of the acts that an advanced emergency medical technician can perform, and (2) visualized intubation. This section terminates on December 31, 2025.

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 14;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 21.